Maine, session 132, LD659.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §9724, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
8. Installation or use of fire sprinkler systems in certain homes. Notwithstanding
any provision of this chapter to the contrary, a municipality may not adopt or enforce any
provision of a building code, including the Maine Uniform Building Code, the Maine
Uniform Energy Code or the Maine Uniform Building and Energy Code, that requires the
installation or use of fire sprinkler systems in a single-family dwelling or duplex.